New Jersey, session 222, A3573.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 48 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-52) is amended to read as follows: 48.  a.  (1)  [No] Except as provided in section 2 of P.L.    , c. (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), no employer shall refuse to hire or employ any person or shall discharge from employment or take any adverse action against any employee with respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or other privileges of employment because that person does or does not smoke, vape, aerosolize or otherwise use cannabis items, and an employee shall not be subject to any adverse action by an employer solely due to the presence of cannabinoid metabolites in the employee's bodily fluid from engaging in conduct permitted under P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.).  However, an employer may require an employee to undergo a drug test upon reasonable suspicion of an employee's usage of a cannabis item while engaged in the performance of the employee's work responsibilities, or upon finding any observable signs of intoxication related to usage of a cannabis item, or following a work-related accident subject to investigation by the employer.  A drug test may also be done randomly by the employer, or as part of a pre-employment screening, or regular screening of current employees to determine use during an employee's prescribed work hours.  The drug test shall include scientifically reliable objective testing methods and procedures, such as testing of blood, urine, or saliva, and a physical evaluation in order to determine an employee's state of impairment.  The physical evaluation shall be conducted by an individual with the necessary certification to opine on the employee's state of impairment, or lack thereof, related to the usage of a cannabis item in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection.  The employer may use the results of the drug test when determining the appropriate employment action concerning the employee, including, but not limited to dismissal, suspension, demotion, or other disciplinary action. (2)   (a) In order to better ensure the protections for prospective employees and employees against refusals to hire or employ, or against being discharged or having any other adverse action taken by an employer, while simultaneously supporting the authority of employers to require employees undergo drug tests under the circumstances set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection, as well as employer efforts to maintain a drug- and alcohol-free workplace or other drug- or alcohol workplace policy as described in paragraph (1) of subsection b. of this section, the commission, in consultation with the Police Training Commission established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1961, c.56 (C.52:17B-70), shall prescribe standards in regulation for a Workplace Impairment Recognition Expert certification, to be issued to full- or part-time employees, or others contracted to perform services on behalf of an employer, based on education and training in detecting and identifying an employee's usage of, or impairment from, a cannabis item or other intoxicating substance, and for assisting in the investigation of workplace accidents.  The commission's regulations shall also prescribe minimum curriculum courses of study for the certifications, as well as standards for the commission's approval and continuation of approval of non-profit and for-profit programs, organizations, or schools and their instructors to offer courses of study, and may include the use of a Police Training Commission approved school as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.1961, c.56 (C.52:17B-67) if consented to by the Police Training Commission. (b)   Any person who demonstrates to the commission's satisfaction that the person has successfully completed a Drug Recognition Expert program provided by a Police Training Commission approved school, or another program or course conducted by any federal, State, or other public or private agency, the requirements of which are substantially equivalent to the requirements established by the commission pursuant to subparagraph (a) of this paragraph for a Workplace Impairment Recognition Expert certification, may, at the discretion of the commission, be issued this certification, subject to subsequent continuation of certification approval by the commission. b.    Nothing in P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.): (1)  (a)  Requires an employer to amend or repeal, or affect, restrict or preempt the rights and obligations of employers to maintain a drug- and alcohol-free workplace or require an employer to permit or accommodate the use, consumption, being under the influence, possession, transfer, display, transportation, sale, or growth of cannabis or cannabis items in the workplace, or to affect the ability of employers to have policies prohibiting use of cannabis items or intoxication by employees during work hours; (b)   If any of the provisions set forth in this paragraph or subsection a. of this section result in a provable adverse impact on an employer subject to the requirements of a federal contract, then the employer may revise their employee prohibitions consistent with federal law, rules, and regulations; (2)   Is intended to allow driving under the influence of cannabis items or driving while impaired by cannabis items or to supersede laws related to driving under the influence of marijuana or cannabis items or driving while impaired by marijuana or cannabis items; (3)   Is intended to permit the transfer of cannabis items, with or without remuneration, to a person under 21 years of age or to allow a person under 21 years of age to purchase, possess, use, transport, grow, or consume cannabis items, unless the person is under 21 years of age, but at least 18 years of age, and an employee of a cannabis establishment, distributor, or delivery service acting in the person's employment capacity; (4)   Shall, consistent with subsection c. of section 46 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.2C:35-10a), prohibit a person or entity that owns or controls a property from prohibiting or otherwise regulating the consumption, use, display, transfer, distribution, sale, or transportation of cannabis items on or in that property, or portion thereof, including a hotel property that is a casino hotel facility as defined in section 19 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-19), a casino as defined in section 6 of P.L.1977, c.110 (C.5:12-6), or casino simulcasting facility authorized pursuant to the "Casino Simulcasting Act," P.L.1992, c.19 (C.5:12-191 et al.), provided that a person or entity that owns or controls multifamily housing that is a multiple dwelling as defined in section 3 of P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-3), the structure or specific units of the structure of a cooperative as defined in section 3 of P.L.1987, c.381 (C.46:8D-3),a unit of a condominium as defined in section 3 of P.L.1969, c.257 (C.46:8B-3), or a site in a mobile home park as defined in section 3 of P.L.1983, c.386 (C.40:55D-102), which site is leased to the owner of a manufactured home, as defined in that section, that is installed thereon, may only prohibit or otherwise regulate the smoking, vaping, or aerosolizing, but not other consumption, of cannabis items, and further provided that municipalities may not prohibit delivery, possession, or consumption of cannabis items by a person 21 years of age or older as permitted by section  46 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.2C:35-10a); (5)   Is intended to permit any person to possess, consume, use, display, transfer, distribute, sell, transport, or grow or manufacture cannabis or cannabis items in a school, hospital, detention facility, adult correctional facility, or youth correctional facility; (6)   Is intended to permit the smoking, vaping, or aerosolizing of cannabis items in any place that any other law prohibits the smoking of tobacco, including N.J.S.2C:33-13 and the "New Jersey Smoke-Free Air Act," P.L.2005, c.383 (C.26:3D-55 et seq.). Except as otherwise provided by P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), any fines or civil penalties that may be assessed for the smoking of tobacco in designated places shall be applicable to the smoking, vaping, or aerosolizing of cannabis items. (cf: P.L.2021, c.16, s.48) 2.    (New section)  a.  A law enforcement agency or appointing authority may discharge from employment or appointment or take any adverse action against a law enforcement officer with respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or other privileges of employment or appointment if that person uses cannabis items, as permitted under P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), while employed by a law enforcement agency or serving a term of appointment. A law enforcement officer may be subject to adverse action by an employer or appointing authority solely due to the presence of cannabinoid metabolites in the law enforcement officers bodily fluid due to conduct permitted under P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.). A law enforcement agency or appointing authority may conduct random drug tests of law enforcement officers. The drug test shall include testing methods and procedures as determined by the Attorney General. b.    A law enforcement agency may refuse to hire and an appointing authority may refuse to appoint a prospective law enforcement officer due to the officers use of cannabis items, as permitted under P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-31 et al.), and may employ the use of drug testing in accordance with subsection b. of this section as part of pre-employment or pre-appointment screening. c.     Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to employees or appointees who are not law enforcement officers, as defined in this section, or to limit any of the provisions set forth in subsection b. of section 48 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-52). d.    For the purposes of this section: Appointing authority means the governing board or body of a municipality that appoints constables and humane law enforcement officers to terms of service. Law enforcement agency means a department, division, bureau, commission, board, or other authority of the State or of any political subdivision thereof which employs law enforcement officers. Law enforcement officer means a person employed as a full or part-time member of any law enforcement agency who is statutorily empowered to act for the detection, investigation, arrest, conviction, detention, or rehabilitation of persons violating the criminal laws of this State. The term includes special law enforcement officers of all classes, appointed pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1985, c.439 (C.40A:14-146.14); constables, appointed pursuant to N.J.S.40A:9-120; auxiliary police, appointed pursuant to section 13 of P.L.1942, c.251 (C.App.A:9-45); and humane law enforcement officers, appointed pursuant to section 25 of P.L.2017, c.331 (C.4:22-14.1). 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.